Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1173.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 211 of the act of April 12, 1951 (P.L.90, No.21), known as the Liquor Code, is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 211. Enforcement.--* * *(h) The following shall apply:(1) An individual who is under twenty-one years of age may 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526 purchase, attempt to purchase, possess or transport liquor or malt or brewed beverages if all of the following apply:(i) The individual is at least eighteen years of age.(ii) The individual is an officer, employe or intern of the enforcement bureau.(iii) The individual has completed training specified by the enforcement bureau.(iv) The individual is acting within the scope of prescribed duties.(v) The individual is acting under the direct control or supervision of an enforcement bureau officer who is an adult.(2) Individuals under twenty-one years of age may not consume liquor or malt or brewed beverages.(3) The Pennsylvania State Police shall promulgate regulations prescribing the manner in which compliance checks are to be performed. Compliance checks under this subsection shall be conducted in a manner consistent with the regulations. Regulations shall require, at a minimum, all of the following:(i) Prior to participation in the compliance check, the officer, employe or intern shall undergo training approved by the enforcement bureau.(ii) Compliance checks shall include Pennsylvania Liquor Stores.(iii) A person licensed to sell liquor or malt or brewed beverages that is found to be in compliance with 18 Pa.C.S. § 6310.1 (relating to selling or furnishing liquor or malt or brewed beverages to minors) and section 493(1) during a compliance check shall be notified in writing of the compliance check and the determination of compliance.(iv) A person licensed to sell liquor or malt or brewed 20250HB1173PN1310 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 beverages that is found to be noncompliant with 18 Pa.C.S. § 6310.1 or section 493(1) during a compliance check shall be immediately verbally advised by the supervising enforcement bureau officer and shall be notified in writing of the failure to comply within ten working days of the date of the compliance check.(4) By January 31 of each year, the Pennsylvania State Police shall submit a report to the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Law and Justice Committee of the Senate and the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Liquor Control Committee of the House of Representatives on the number of compliance checks performed in the previous calendar year and whether the result of each compliance check was compliant or noncompliant.(5) The provisions of this subsection shall expire five years from the effective date of this subsection.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1173PN1310 - 3 - 1234567891011121314151617